Utah statutes.
63G-1-702.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Capitol hill complex" is as defined in Section 63C-9-102.

(2) (a)  "Flag" means a depiction or emblem made from fabric or cloth.

(b)  "Flag" does not include a depiction or emblem made from:

(i)  lights;

(ii)  paint;

(iii)  roofing;

(iv)  siding;

(v)  paving materials;

(vi)  flora;

(vii)  balloons; or

(viii)  any other building, landscaping, or decorative component other than fabric or cloth.

(3)  "Flag of the United States" is the flag described in United States Code Title 4, Chapter 1, The Flag.

(4)  "POW/MIA flag" means the POW/MIA flag of the National League of Families of American Prisoners and Missing in Southeast Asia.



Enacted by Chapter 90, 2013 General Session

